Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB537.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Medical Assistance Payments for Orthotics and Prosthetics.-- (a) The department shall set a rate of reimbursement under the medical assistance fee-for-service program for custom prosthetic and orthotic items and services at a rate no less than the current quarter's Medicare Durable Medical Equipment, Prosthetics, Orthotics and Supplies Fee Schedule established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for these items and services in this Commonwealth.(b) The department shall update the medical assistance fee-12345678910111213141516171819 for-service program to include all codes for custom prosthetic and orthotic items and services listed in the current quarter's Medicare Durable Medical Equipment, Prosthetics, Orthotics and Supplies Fee Schedule established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the provisions of section 443.6 or the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the "Medical Practice Act of 1985."Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0537PN0558 - 2 - 123456789